nursery/apertium-nld-fry/apertium-nld-fry.fry.dix
    <pardef n="moa/tte__vbmod">
      <e><p><l>tte</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tten</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tten</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ttend</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ttende</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tst</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tte</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>oast</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oast</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oast</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oasten</l><r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="s/ille__vbmod">
      <e><p><l>ille</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>illen</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>illen</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ild</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>illend</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>illende</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>l</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lst</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>l</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ille</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>oe</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oest</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oe</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oenen</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oene</l><r>ille<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="wo/lle__vbmod">
      <e><p><l>lle</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>llen</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>llen</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ld</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>llend</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>llende</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>l</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lst</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>l</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lle</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>e</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>est</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enen</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ene</l><r>lle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/inne__vbmod">
      <e><p><l>inne</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>innen</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inne</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ind</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>innend</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>innende</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inst</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kin</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inne</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>oe</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oest</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oe</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oenen</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oene</l><r>inne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pra/te__vblex">
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ten</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>at</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<!--
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ind</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>end</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ende</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>st</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>de</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dest</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>de</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>den</l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
-->
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="mien/e__vblex">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>d</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ind</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>end</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ende</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>st</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>de</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dest</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>de</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>den</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="kinne"><i>k</i><par n="k/inne__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="wolle"><i>wo</i><par n="wo/lle__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="sille"><i>s</i><par n="s/ille__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="moatte"><i>moa</i><par n="moa/tte__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="miene"><i>mien</i><par n="mien/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="telle"><i>tell</i><par n="mien/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="leare"><i>lear</i><par n="mien/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prate"><i>pra</i><par n="pra/te__vblex"/></e>
